Utah statutes.
16-16-802.   No liability as director for limited cooperative association's obligations.

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited cooperative association is solely that of the association and is not a debt, obligation, or liability of a director solely by reason of being a director.  An individual is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, for an obligation of an association solely by reason of being a director.

